District of Columbia statutes.
31-5603.01

Registration requirement.

No person shall offer or sell a security in the District unless the security is registered under this chapter, the security or transaction is exempt under § 31-5604.01 or § 31-5604.02, or the security is a federal covered security.

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 301, 47 DCR 7837
This section is referenced in § 31-5603.08, § 31-5604.01, § 31-5604.02, § 31-5604.03, § 31-5604.04, § 31-5605.01, § 31-5606.05, and § 31-5608.01.
Section 806 of D.C. Law 13-203 provided: “Titles III and IV shall apply as of June 1, 2001.”